3lexc/test2.txt
Multichar_Symbols
  +N +Sg +Pl +V +Base +Past +PastPart +Sg3 +PresPart

LEXICON Root
  Nouns; Verbs;

LEXICON Nouns
  line N;

LEXICON Verbs
  dine V; line V; stop V;
  swim VIrreg; swim:swam VIrregPast; swim:swum
VIrregPastPart;

LEXICON N
  +N:0 NounInfl;

LEXICON NounInfl
    +Sg:0 #; +Pl:s #;

LEXICON V
  +V:0 RegVerbConj;

LEXICON RegVerbConj
  VCommon; RegPast;  RegPastPart;
  
LEXICON VCommon
  +Base:0 #; +Sg3:s #; 0+PresPart:^ing #;

LEXICON RegPast
  0+Past:^ed #; 

LEXICON RegPastPart
  0+PastPart:^ed #;

LEXICON VIrreg
  +V:0 VCommon;

LEXICON VIrregPast
  +V+Past:0 #;

LEXICON VIrregPastPart
  +V+PastPart:0 #;
